California, session 20252026, AB2412.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11549.66 of the Government Code is amended to read:11549.66. (a) A state agency or department that utilizes uses GenAI to directly communicate with the public, including through both individualized direct communications and general public announcements, public shall ensure that those communications include both of the following:(a)(1) A disclaimer that indicates to the person that the communication was generated by GenAI pursuant to all of the following:(1)(A) For written communications involving physical and digital media, including letters, email, and other occasional messages, the disclaimer shall appear prominently at the start of each communication.(2)(B) For written communications involving continuous online interactions, including interactions with chatbots, the disclaimer shall be prominently displayed throughout the interaction.(3)(C) For audio communications, the disclaimer shall be provided orally at the start and end of the interaction.(4)(D) For video communications, the disclaimer shall be prominently displayed throughout the interaction.(b)(2) Information, or a link to an internet website containing information, describing how a person may contact a human employee of the state agency or department.(b) (1) As used in this section, “directly communicate” means to use GenAI, instead of a natural person, to communicate directly with a specific member of the public or to communicate a general public announcement.(2) “Directly communicate” does not mean to use GenAI to assist in the drafting of a communication.